Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 350.475 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Energy and Environment Cabinet is directed to promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A which specifically address what
liability surface mining permittees shall have to reclaim permit areas on which
parties or forces not controlled by the permittee have disturbed the reclamation
previously performed by the permittee. The[Such] parties or forces not controlled
by the permittee shall include, without limitation, acts of God, oil and gas
operations, loggers, recreational vehicles, and trespassers.
(2) The Energy and Environment Cabinet is also directed to promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A which specifically set forth the
procedure for transferring liability for reclamation of a surface mining permit to a
party who will make a post mining use of the permit area.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 2:56 PM Jacketed